Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,141
Military education, training, or service; department; acceptance for credential.

Beginning December 15, 2015, upon presentation of satisfactory evidence that the education, training, or service completed by an applicant for a credential while a member of the armed forces of the United States, active or reserve, the National Guard of any state, the military reserves of any state, or the naval militia of any state is substantially similar to the education required for the credential, the department, with the recommendation of the appropriate board, if any, shall accept such education, training, or service toward the minimum standards for the credential.

Laws 2015, LB264, § 3.